Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2622
Termination of guardianship for incapacitated person; liability for prior acts; obligation to account.

The authority and responsibility of a guardian for an incapacitated person terminates upon the death of the guardian or ward, the determination of incapacity of the guardian, or upon removal or resignation as provided in section 30-2623. Testamentary appointment under an informally probated will terminates if the will is later denied probate in a formal proceeding. Termination does not affect his liability for prior acts nor his obligation to account for funds and assets of his ward.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 240, UPC § 5-306;

Laws 1975, LB 481, § 19.